Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2131.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2229.1C of Title 74, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Division of State Parks shall ensure that a “Made in
Oklahoma” product list is made available to state park visitors at
the entrance to buildings including, but not limited to, park
offices and lodges. Such list shall also be provided to individuals
when they reserve park accommodations online.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 2230, is
amended to read as follows:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2131 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Section 2230. A. The Travel Promotion Division shall:
1. Encourage the orderly growth and development of tourism to
and within the state by preparing and maintaining a comprehensive
five-year travel development master plan and supporting marketing
plan jointly with the private sector;
2. Create and convey an accurate, responsible, and elevated
image of the state and its natural, cultural, historical, and
recreational attractions and events;
3. Organize, coordinate, and conduct state, regional, national,
and international marketing programs to increase the number of
domestic and international travelers to Oklahoma;
4. Create, develop, produce, distribute, implement, and
evaluate the effectiveness of public information programs, including
publicity, brochures, public relations activities, film and slide
production, still and audio visual photography, digital and
electronic media, public service programs, advertising, and other
informational aids for the promotion of tourism to the general
public and the media;
5. Coordinate, advise and provide technical assistance to
cities, counties, and regional tourism organizations in the state in
the planning, development, and execution of tourism programs;
6. Cooperate and participate with neighboring states and the
federal government to promote travel from domestic and international
markets;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2131 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

7. Develop and partner with other entities of government and
private entities to obtain timely research data to measure traveler
volume and economic impact, determine traveler profiles, evaluate,
and analyze market and advertising effectiveness;
8. Plan, coordinate, and conduct statewide conferences,
seminars, and workshops to inform and educate representatives from
the public and private sector in the state about programs and travel
trends which affect the tourism industry;
9. Provide organization and coordination assistance to public
and private tourism promotion organizations for participation in
cooperative advertising and promotion opportunities with the
Department, including travel trade marketplaces, consumer sport,
travel, and recreation shows within and outside the state;
10. Administer matching grant programs to multicounty
organizations which promote travel and tourism to their areas of the
state that are consistent and coordinated with the statewide travel
marketing plan; and
11. Assist other state agencies with special tourism promotion
projects, development of professional training opportunities and
other projects which provide services to travelers.
B. The Division may facilitate travel to and within the state
by encouraging development of a tourism industry infrastructure
which provides investment incentives to tourism businesses and
tourism product development.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2131 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

C. The Division may contract with professionally qualified
companies or individuals for services to assist in the development
and production of advertising, promotion, publicity, and public
relations programs, primary and secondary research data collection
including analysis of state travel marketing programs and economic
impact information.
D. The Division may plan, construct, lease, operate, and
maintain state-of-the-art tourism information centers and a central
fulfillment warehouse. The centers shall be utilized for the
purpose of providing services, selling merchandise, and distributing
information to travelers on the tourism facilities and opportunities
in the state. The Division shall require, as part of the lease
agreement for spaces leased pursuant to this subsection, that a list
of “Made in Oklahoma” products be made available to travelers,
including through online reservation platforms and as part of
reservation documentation.
E. The Division may, upon approval of the Commission, lease for
a reasonable rate, retail and advertising space in state-operated
tourism information centers. A performance bond, certificate of
deposit, letter of credit, or cash equivalent, may be required by
the Commission on any such lease.
F. Photographs, film recordings, video recordings, digital
records and like recordings or records produced by or for the
Division shall be available for public inspection during Division
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2131 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

busi ness hours; however, the Division shall not be required to
provide copies or allow copying of the materials.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT, WORKFORCE
AND TOURISM
February 24, 2026 - DO PASS



















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2131 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)